Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1172.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 14, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1971, to read: START_STATUTE41-1971. Credentialing or recredentialing applications; developmental disabilities services; deficiencies; denial; appeal; rules; definitions A. if the department denies An application for CREDENTIALING or recredentialing, the department shall give the applicant an OPPORTUNITY to correct any DEFICIENCIES with the application that led to the INITIAL denial. The applicant has fourteen business days after receiving the notice of DENIAL from the department to correct the DEFICIENCIES. If the applicant notifies the department in writing within the fourteen-day period that the deficiencies have been corrected, the department shall reevaluate the credentialing or reCREDENTIALING application. B. If after reevaluation the department denies the application and does not initiate a contract action within fourteen business days, the applicant may appeal the decision pursuant to Article 3 of this chapter. C. on or before june 30, 2027, the department shall adopt rules to implement this section. d. for the purposes of this section: 1. "APPLICANT" MEANS A PERSON OR ORGANIZATION THAT HAS SUBMITTED AN APPLICATION SEEKING CREDENTIALING BY THE DEPARTMENT. 2. "CREDENTIALING" means the process of verifying the qualifications and standards and any other requirements a vendor must have to be ELIGIBLE to contract with the department to provide services pursuant to section 36-557.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR MAY 29, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY 29, 2026.